Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2893.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; Navajo Nation division of transportation; transportation projects The following amounts are appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation to distribute to the Navajo Nation division of transportation for the following projects: 1. $32,056,900 for graveling and chip sealing and raising the roadway of and for drainage improvements to Navajo Route 8090. 2. $3,184,300 for grading, graveling and stabilizing and for drainage improvements to Navajo Route 8070. 3. $788,300 for grading, graveling and stabilizing and for drainage improvements to Navajo Route 8009.